src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 094
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>dde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dde # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 094K1
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>as # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>dde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dde # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 095
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>dde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>tt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>tt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dde # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 095K1
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>as # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>dde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>tt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>tt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dde # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 098
 +Inf:%> # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>r # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>dde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dde # ;
 +Adj:%>dande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 098K1
 +Inf:%> # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>r # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>das # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>dde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dde # ;
 +Adj:%>dande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 099
 +Inf:%> # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>r # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>dde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>dt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dde # ;
 +Adj:%>dande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 099K1
 +Inf:%> # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>r # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>das # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>dde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>dt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dde # ;
 +Adj:%>dande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 099T
 +Inf:%> # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>r # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>dde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>tt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dde # ;
 +Adj:%>dande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 104
 +Inf:%>burde # ;
 +Inf:%>burda # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>bør # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>burdast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>burde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>burt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>burt # ;

LEXICON 104K1
 +Inf:%>burde # ;
 +Inf:%>burda # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>bør # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>burdas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>burde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>burt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>burt # ;

LEXICON 105
 +Inf:%>burde # ;
 +Inf:%>burda # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>bør # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>burdast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>burde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>burd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>burd # ;

LEXICON 105K1
 +Inf:%>burde # ;
 +Inf:%>burda # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>bør # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>burdas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>burde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>burd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>burd # ;

LEXICON 106
 +Inf:%>eggje # ;
 +Inf:%>eggja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>egg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eggjast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>agd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>agde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>agde # ;
 +Adj:%>eggjande # ;
 +Imp:%>egg # ;

LEXICON 106K1
 +Inf:%>eggje # ;
 +Inf:%>eggja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>egg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eggjas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>agd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>agde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>agde # ;
 +Adj:%>eggjande # ;
 +Imp:%>egg # ;

LEXICON 107
 +Inf:%>eggje # ;
 +Inf:%>eggja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>egg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eggjast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>agde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>agd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>agde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>agde # ;
 +Adj:%>eggjande # ;
 +Imp:%>egg # ;

LEXICON 107K1
 +Inf:%>eggje # ;
 +Inf:%>eggja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>egg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eggjas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>agde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>agd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>agde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>agde # ;
 +Adj:%>eggjande # ;
 +Imp:%>egg # ;

LEXICON 108
 +Inf:%>je # ;
 +Inf:%>ja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%> # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>jande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 108K1
 +Inf:%>je # ;
 +Inf:%>ja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%> # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>jande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 109
 +Inf:%>je # ;
 +Inf:%>ja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%> # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>te # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>te # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>te # ;
 +Adj:%>jande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 109K1
 +Inf:%>je # ;
 +Inf:%>ja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%> # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>te # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>te # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>te # ;
 +Adj:%>jande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 111
 +Inf:%>egge # ;
 +Inf:%>egga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>egg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eggast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>agd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>agde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>agde # ;
 +Adj:%>eggande # ;
 +Imp:%>egg # ;

LEXICON 111K1
 +Inf:%>egge # ;
 +Inf:%>egga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>egg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eggas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>agd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>agde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>agde # ;
 +Adj:%>eggande # ;
 +Imp:%>egg # ;

LEXICON 112
 +Inf:%>egge # ;
 +Inf:%>egga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>egg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eggast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>agde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>agd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>agde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>agde # ;
 +Adj:%>eggande # ;
 +Imp:%>egg # ;

LEXICON 112K1
 +Inf:%>egge # ;
 +Inf:%>egga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>egg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eggas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>agde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>agt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>agd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>agde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>agde # ;
 +Adj:%>eggande # ;
 +Imp:%>egg # ;

LEXICON 113
 +Inf:%>je # ;
 +Inf:%>ja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%> # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>te # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>te # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>te # ;
 +Adj:%>jande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 113K1
 +Inf:%>je # ;
 +Inf:%>ja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%> # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>te # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>te # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>te # ;
 +Adj:%>jande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 114
 +Inf:%>øje # ;
 +Inf:%>øja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ø # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>øjast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ude # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ut # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ut # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ud # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ude # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ude # ;
 +Adj:%>øjande # ;
 +Imp:%>ø # ;

LEXICON 114K1
 +Inf:%>øje # ;
 +Inf:%>øja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ø # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>øjas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ude # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ut # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ut # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ud # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ude # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ude # ;
 +Adj:%>øjande # ;
 +Imp:%>ø # ;

LEXICON 115
 +Inf:%>øje # ;
 +Inf:%>øja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ø # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>øjast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ute # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ud # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ud # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ud # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ude # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ude # ;
 +Adj:%>øjande # ;
 +Imp:%>ø # ;

LEXICON 115K1
 +Inf:%>øje # ;
 +Inf:%>øja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ø # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>øjas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ute # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ud # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ud # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ud # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ude # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ude # ;
 +Adj:%>øjande # ;
 +Imp:%>ø # ;

LEXICON 116
 +Inf:%>eje # ;
 +Inf:%>eja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ejer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ejast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ate # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>at # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>at # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>at # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ate # ;
 +Adj:%>ejande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 116K1
 +Inf:%>eje # ;
 +Inf:%>eja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ejer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ejas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ate # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>at # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>at # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>at # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ate # ;
 +Adj:%>ejande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;
