src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
burde+V:b 104 ; ! LEMMA_ID=11935
dølje+V:d 114 ; ! LEMMA_ID=16309
fordølje+V:ford 114 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24140
forselje+V:forsel 108 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24918
forspørje+V:forsp 114 ; ! LEMMA_ID=25064
gjennomglø+V:gjennomglø 099 ; ! LEMMA_ID=30433
hylje+V:hyl 108 ; ! LEMMA_ID=39050
kylje+V:kyl 108 ; ! LEMMA_ID=53239
rådspørje+V:rådsp 114 ; ! LEMMA_ID=76705
selje+V:sel 108 ; ! LEMMA_ID=78542
skilje+V:skil 108 ; ! LEMMA_ID=81777
skylje+V:skyl 108 ; ! LEMMA_ID=84914
smørje+V:sm 114 ; ! LEMMA_ID=86418
spørje+V:sp 114 ; ! LEMMA_ID=89018
timje+V:tim 108 ; ! LEMMA_ID=96745
tjørebre+V:tjørebre 099 ; ! LEMMA_ID=97115
underselje+V:undersel 108 ; ! LEMMA_ID=104141
vinterfø+V:vinterfø 099 ; ! LEMMA_ID=111531
overskylje+V:overskyl 108 ; ! LEMMA_ID=128572
vassmørje+V:vassm 114 ; ! LEMMA_ID=128829
